Tennessee, session 114, SB2364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-21-1201(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) All rules transferred from the commission to the attorney general pursuant to
§ 4-5-226(b)(2) are repealed.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-21-205(g), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(g)
(1) Unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown,
complaints filed with the attorney general and all documentary material or other
information obtained by the attorney general pursuant to an investigation under
this chapter must not be produced for inspection, copied by, or its contents
disclosed to, a person other than an authorized representative of the attorney
general for the purpose of investigation or prosecution without the consent of the
person who produced the material or information, except that documentary
material obtained by the attorney general pursuant to this section may be
provided to the complainant, the respondent, their attorneys, or any state or
federal law enforcement agency seeking to enforce anti-discrimination statutes.
(2) The attorney general may use copies of the documentary material or
information produced in accordance with this section as it determines necessary
SB2364
012064
- 1 -

in the enforcement of this part, including the presentation of such material or
information before a court.
(3) All other documentary material, answers to written interrogatories,
and transcripts of oral testimony that are voluntarily provided to the attorney
general as part of an investigation under this section must be treated as if such
information was obtained pursuant to a request issued under this section if such
materials were obtained pursuant to an investigative demand or similar process
issued by another state or federal attorney general, obtained from a state or
federal attorney general pursuant to a statutory obligation to produce such
information, or provided by a person with information relevant to the subject
matter of the investigation.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-21-302(b)(3)(F), is amended by
deleting the language "commission" and substituting "attorney general".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-21-303(d), is amended by deleting:
The conciliation agreement must not be made public without the agreement of
the complainant and the respondent, and the determination by the attorney
general that disclosure is not required to further this chapter.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012064